Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; AGE AND SIZE EXCEPTION FOR CERTAIN SETTINGS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services must determine that the brain injury (BI) or community access for disability inclusion (CADI) waiver customized living and 24-hour customized living age and size limitation exceptions apply to three housing settings located at 8751 Preserve Boulevard, 8761 Preserve Boulevard, and 8771 Preserve Boulevard in the city of Eden Prairie that provide customized living and 24-hour customized living services to clients enrolled in the BI and CADI waivers and had a capacity to serve ten clients at each address as of July 1, 2022. new text end